Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5197.
peoplE of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 7. (1) "Filed" means the receipt by the appropriate filing official of a statement or report required to be filed under this act. (2) "Filer" means a person required to file a statement or report under this act. (3) "Filing official" means the official designated under this act to receive required statements and reports. (4) "Foreign national" means any of the following: (a) An individual who is not a citizen of the United States. (b) A government, or subdivision, of a foreign country or a municipality of a foreign country. (c) A foreign political party. (d) Any entity, including, but not limited to, a partnership, association, corporation, organization, or other combination of persons, that is organized under the laws of, or has its principal place of business in, a foreign country. (5) (4) "Fund raising event" means an event such as a dinner, reception, testimonial, rally, auction, or similar affair through which contributions are solicited or received by purchase of a ticket, payment of an attendance fee, making a donation, or purchase of goods or services. (6) (5) "Gift" means a payment, subscription, advance, forbearance, rendering, or deposit of money, services, or anything of value, unless consideration of equal or greater value is given in exchange. (7) (6) "Honorarium" means a payment of money to a person holding elective office as consideration for an appearance, a speech, an article, or any activity related to or associated with the performance of duties as an elected official. An honorarium does not include any of the following: (a) Reimbursement for the cost of transportation, accommodations, or meals for the person. (b) Wages, salaries, other employee compensation, and expenses authorized to be paid by this state or a political subdivision of this state to the person holding elective office. (c) An award. Sec. 15. (1) The secretary of state shall do all of the following: (a) Make available through his or her the secretary of state's offices, and furnish to county clerks, appropriate forms, instructions, and manuals required by this act. (b) Develop a filing, coding, and cross-indexing system for the filing of required reports and statements consistent with this act, and supervise the implementation of the filing systems by the clerks of the counties. (c) Receive all statements and reports required by this act to be filed with the secretary of state. (d) Prepare forms, instructions, and manuals required under this act. (e) Promulgate rules and issue declaratory rulings to implement this act in accordance with the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (f) Upon On receipt of a written request and the required filing, waive payment of a late filing fee if the request for the waiver is based on good cause and accompanied by adequate documentation. One or more of the following reasons constitute good cause for a late filing fee waiver: (i) The incapacitating physical illness, hospitalization, accident involvement, death, or incapacitation for medical reasons of a person an individual required to file, a person an individual whose participation is essential to the preparation of the statement or report, or a member of the immediate family of these persons.individuals. (ii) Other unique, unintentional factors beyond the filer's control not stemming from a negligent act or nonaction so that a reasonably prudent person would excuse the filing on a temporary basis. These factors include the loss or unavailability of records due to a fire, flood, theft, or similar reason and difficulties related to the transmission of the filing to the filing official, such as exceptionally bad weather or strikes involving transportation systems. (2) A The secretary of state shall issue a declaratory ruling shall be issued under this section only if the person requesting the ruling has provided a reasonably complete statement of facts necessary for the ruling or if the person requesting the ruling has, with the permission of the secretary of state, supplied supplemental facts necessary for the ruling. A request for a declaratory ruling that is submitted to the secretary of state shall must be made available for public inspection within not later than 48 hours after its receipt. An interested person may submit written comments regarding the request to the secretary of state within not later than 10 business days after the date the request is made available to the public. Within Not later than 45 business days after receiving a declaratory ruling request, the secretary of state shall make a proposed response available to the public. An interested person may submit written comments regarding the proposed response to the secretary of state within not later than 5 business days after the date the proposal is made available to the public. Except as otherwise provided in this section, the secretary of state shall issue a declaratory ruling within not later than 60 business days after a request for a declaratory ruling is received. If the secretary of state refuses to issue a declaratory ruling, the secretary of state shall notify the person making the request of the reasons for the refusal and shall issue an interpretative statement providing an informational response to the question presented within the same time limitation applicable to a declaratory ruling. A declaratory ruling or interpretative statement issued under this section shall must not state a general rule of law, other than that which is stated in this act, until the general rule of law is promulgated by the secretary of state as a rule under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328, or under judicial order. (3) Under extenuating circumstances, the secretary of state may issue a notice extending for not more than 30 business days the period during which the secretary of state shall respond to a request for a declaratory ruling. The secretary of state shall not issue more than 1 notice of extension for a particular request. A person requesting a declaratory ruling may waive, in writing, the time limitations provided by this section. (4) The secretary of state shall make available to the public an annual summary of the declaratory rulings and interpretative statements issued by the secretary of state. (5) A person may file with the secretary of state a complaint that alleges a violation of this act. Within Not later than 5 business days after a complaint that meets the requirements of subsection (6) is filed, the secretary of state shall give notice to the person against whom the complaint is filed. The notice shall must include a copy of the complaint. Within Not later than 15 business days after this notice is mailed, the person against whom the complaint was filed may submit a response to the secretary of state. The secretary of state may extend the period for submitting a response an additional 15 business days for good cause. The secretary of state shall provide a copy of a response received to the complainant. Within Not later than 10 business days after the response is mailed, the complainant may submit a rebuttal statement to the secretary of state. The secretary of state may extend the period for submitting a rebuttal statement an additional 10 business days for good cause. The secretary of state shall provide a copy of the rebuttal statement to the person against whom the complaint was filed. (6) A complaint filed under subsection (5) shall must satisfy all of the following requirements: (a) Be signed by the complainant. (b) State the name, address, and telephone number of the complainant. (c) Include the complainant's certification that, to the best of the complainant's knowledge, information, and belief, formed after a reasonable inquiry under the circumstances, each factual contention of the complaint is supported by evidence. However, if, after a reasonable inquiry under the circumstances, the complainant is unable to certify that certain factual contentions are supported by evidence, the complainant may certify that, to the best of his or her the complainant's knowledge, information, or belief, there are grounds to conclude that those specifically identified factual contentions are likely to be supported by evidence after a reasonable opportunity for further inquiry. (7) The secretary of state shall develop a form that satisfies the requirements of subsection (6) and may be used for the filing of complaints. (8) A person who files a complaint with a false certificate under subsection (6)(c) is responsible for a civil violation of this act. A person may file a complaint under subsection (5) alleging that another person has filed a complaint with a false certificate under subsection (6)(c). (9) The secretary of state shall investigate the allegations under the rules promulgated under this act. If the violation involves the secretary of state, the immediate family of the secretary of state, or a campaign or committee with which the secretary of state is connected, directly or indirectly, the secretary of state shall refer the matter to the attorney general to determine whether a violation of this act has occurred. (10) No Not later than 45 business days after receipt of a rebuttal statement submitted under subsection (5), or if no response or rebuttal is received under subsection (5), the secretary of state shall post on the secretary of state's Internet website whether or not there may be reason to believe that a violation of this act has occurred. When the secretary of state determines whether there may be reason to believe that a violation of this act occurred or did not occur or determines to terminate its proceedings, the secretary of state shall, within not later than 30 days of after that determination, post on the secretary of state's Internet website any complaint, response, or rebuttal statement received under subsection (5) regarding that violation or alleged violation and any correspondence that is dispositive of that violation or alleged violation between the secretary of state and the complainant or the person against whom the complaint was filed. If the secretary of state determines that there may be reason to believe that a violation of this act occurred, the secretary of state shall endeavor to correct the violation or prevent a further violation by using informal methods such as a conference, conciliation, or persuasion, and may enter into a conciliation agreement with the person involved. Unless violated, a conciliation agreement is a complete bar to any further civil or criminal action with respect to matters covered in the conciliation agreement. The secretary of state shall, within not later than 30 days after a conciliation agreement is signed, post that agreement on the secretary of state's Internet website. If, after 90 business days, the secretary of state is unable to correct or prevent further violation by these informal methods, the secretary of state shall do either of the following: (a) Refer the matter to the attorney general for the enforcement of any criminal penalty provided by this act. (b) Commence a hearing as provided in subsection (11) for enforcement of any civil violation. (11) The secretary of state may commence a hearing to determine whether a civil violation of this act has occurred. The hearing shall must be conducted in accordance with the procedures set forth in chapter 4 of the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.271 to 24.287. 24.288. If after a hearing the secretary of state determines that a violation of this act has occurred, the secretary of state may issue an order requiring the person to pay a civil fine not more than triple the amount of the improper contribution or expenditure plus not more than $1,000.00 for each violation. (12) A final decision and order issued by the secretary of state is subject to judicial review as provided by chapter 6 of the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.301 to 24.306. The secretary of state shall deposit a civil fine imposed under this section in the general fund. The secretary of state may bring an action in circuit court to recover the amount of a civil fine. (13) When a report or statement is filed under this act, the secretary of state shall review the report or statement and may investigate an apparent violation of this act under the rules promulgated under this act. If the secretary of state determines that there may be reason to believe a violation of this act has occurred and the procedures prescribed in subsection (10) have been complied with, the secretary of state may refer the matter to the attorney general for the enforcement of a criminal penalty provided by this act, or commence a hearing under subsection (11) to determine whether a civil violation of this act has occurred. (14) No Not later than 60 business days after a matter is referred to the attorney general for enforcement of a criminal penalty, the attorney general shall determine whether to proceed with enforcement of that penalty. (15) Unless otherwise specified in this act, a person who violates a provision of this act is subject to a civil fine of not more than $1,000.00 for each violation. A civil fine is in addition to, but not limited by, a criminal penalty prescribed by this act. (16) In addition to any other sanction provided for by this act, the secretary of state may require a person who files a complaint with a false certificate under subsection (6)(c) to do either or both of the following: (a) Pay to the secretary of state some or all of the expenses incurred by the secretary of state as a direct result of the filing of the complaint. (b) Pay to the person against whom the complaint was filed some or all of the expenses, including, but not limited to, reasonable attorney fees incurred by that person in proceedings under this act as a direct result of the filing of the complaint. (17) Except as otherwise provided in section 57, there There is no private right of action, either in law or in equity, under this act. Except as otherwise provided in section 57, the The remedies provided in this act are the exclusive means by which this act may be enforced and by which any harm resulting from a violation of this act may be redressed. The criminal penalties provided by this act may only be enforced by the attorney general and only upon referral by the secretary of state as provided under subsection (10) or (13). (18) The secretary of state may waive the filing of a campaign statement required under section 33, 34, or 35 if the closing date of the particular campaign statement falls on the same or a later date as the closing date of the next campaign statement filed by the same person, or if the period that would be otherwise covered by the next campaign statement filed by the same person is 10 days or less. (19) If the secretary of state or attorney general is conducting an investigation or proceeding under this section for a complaint related to a violation of this act by a foreign national and a tax-exempt organization is involved or implicated, the disclosure of the information or identity of donors to the tax-exempt organization is prohibited, except as to the information directly related to the alleged violation of this act. Except for information directly related to the alleged violation of this act, the donor information under this subsection is exempt from disclosure under the freedom of information act, 1976 PA 442, MCL 15.231 to 15.246. As used in this subsection, "tax-exempt organization" means an organization exempt from taxation under section 501(c) of the internal revenue code of 1986, 26 USC 501. (20) (19) The clerk of each county shall do all of the following: (a) Make available through the county clerk's office the appropriate forms, instructions, and manuals required by this act. (b) Under the supervision of the secretary of state, implement the filing, coding, and cross-indexing system prescribed for the filing of reports and statements required to be filed with the county clerk's office. (c) Receive all statements and reports required by this act to be filed with the county clerk's office. (d) Upon On written request, waive the payment of a late filing fee if the request for a waiver is based on good cause as prescribed in subsection (1)(f). Sec. 24. (1) A committee shall file a statement of organization with the filing officials designated in section 36 to receive the committee's campaign statements. A committee shall file a statement of organization within not later than 10 days after the committee is formed. A filing official shall maintain a statement of organization filed by a committee until 5 years after the official date of the committee's dissolution. A person who fails to file a statement of organization required by this subsection shall pay a late filing fee of $10.00 for each business day the statement remains not filed in violation of this subsection. The late filing fee must not exceed $300.00. A person who violates this subsection by failing to file for more than 30 days after a statement of organization is required to be filed is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not more than $1,000.00. (2) The statement of organization required to be filed under subsection (1) must include the following information: (a) The name, street address, and, if available, the electronic mail email address and telephone number of the committee, and the electronic mail email address of the candidate. If a committee is a candidate committee, the committee name must include the first and last name of the candidate. A committee address may be the home address of the candidate or treasurer of the committee. (b) The name, street address, and, if available, the electronic mail email address and telephone number of the treasurer or other individual designated as responsible for the committee's record keeping, report preparation, or report filing. (c) The name and address of the financial institution in which the official committee depository is or is intended to be located, and the name and address of each financial institution in which a secondary depository is or is intended to be located. (d) The full name of the office being sought by, including district number or jurisdiction, and the county residence of each candidate supported or opposed by the committee. (e) A brief statement identifying the substance of each ballot question supported or opposed by the committee. If the ballot question supported or opposed by the committee is a local ballot question, the committee shall identify the county in which the greatest number of registered voters eligible to vote on the ballot question reside. (f) Identification of the committee as a candidate committee, political party committee, independent committee, independent expenditure committee, political committee, or ballot question committee if it is identifiable as such a committee. (g) If the committee is a ballot question committee, a certification that no preliminary activity was directly or indirectly funded by a foreign national. As used in this subdivision, "preliminary activity" means a payment, loan, or promise of money or anything of ascertainable monetary value for goods, materials, services, or facilities in assistance of, or in opposition to, the qualification, passage, or defeat of a ballot question that was made before a ballot question committee submitted a statement of organization. (3) An independent committee or political committee shall include in the name of the committee the name of the person or persons that sponsor the committee, if any, or with whom the committee is affiliated. A person, other than an individual or a committee, sponsors or is affiliated with an independent committee or political committee if that person establishes, directs, controls, or financially supports the administration of the committee. For the purposes of this subsection, a person does not financially support the administration of a committee by merely making a contribution to the committee. (4) If any of the information required in a statement of organization is changed, the committee shall file an amendment when the next campaign statement is required to be filed. (5) When filing a statement of organization, a committee, other than an independent committee, a political committee, or a political party committee, may indicate in a written statement signed by the treasurer of the committee that the committee does not expect for each election to receive an amount in excess of $1,000.00 or expend an amount in excess of $1,000.00. The treasurer of a committee of an incumbent judge or supreme court justice is considered to have made the statement required under this subsection following appointment or election of that judge or justice and is not required to file a written statement under this subsection indicating that the committee does not expect for each election to receive or expend an amount in excess of $1,000.00. (6) When filing a statement of organization, an independent committee, an independent expenditure committee, a political committee, or a political party committee may indicate in a written statement signed by the treasurer of the committee that the committee does not expect in a calendar year to receive or expend an amount in excess of $1,000.00. (7) Upon On the dissolution of a committee, the committee shall file a statement indicating dissolution with the filing officials with whom the committee's statement of organization was filed. Dissolution of a committee must be accomplished pursuant to rules promulgated by the secretary of state under the administrative procedures act of 1969, 1969 PA 306, MCL 24.201 to 24.328. (8) A candidate committee that files a written statement under subsection (5) or that is considered to have made a statement under subsection (5) is not required to file a dissolution statement under subsection (7) if the committee failed to receive or expend an amount in excess of $1,000.00 and 1 of the following applies: (a) The candidate was defeated in an election and has no outstanding campaign debts or assets. (b) The candidate vacates an elective office and has no outstanding campaign debts or assets. (9) A political committee organized for the purpose of making independent expenditures formed before December 31, 2019 is considered an independent expenditure committee. The secretary of state may amend the statement of organization for any committee affected by this subsection. Sec. 26. (1) A campaign statement of a committee, other than a political party committee, required by under this act must contain all of the following information: (a) The filing committee's name, address, and telephone number, and the full name, residential and business addresses, electronic mail email address, and telephone numbers of the committee treasurer or other individual designated as responsible for the committee's record keeping, report preparation, or report filing. (b) Under the heading "receipts", the total amount of contributions received during the period covered by the campaign statement; under the heading "expenditures", the total amount of expenditures made during the period covered by the campaign statement; and the cumulative amount of those totals. Forgiveness of a loan must not be included in the totals. Payment of a loan by a third party must be recorded and reported as an in-kind contribution by the third party. In-kind contributions or expenditures must be listed at fair market value and reported as both contributions and expenditures. A contribution or expenditure that is by other than completed and accepted payment, gift, or other transfer, that is clearly not legally enforceable, and that is expressly withdrawn or rejected and returned before a campaign statement closing date need not be included in the campaign statement and if included may, in a later or amended statement, be shown as a deduction, but the committee shall keep adequate records of each instance. (c) The balance of cash on hand at the beginning and the end of the period covered by the campaign statement. (d) The following information regarding each fund-raising event must be included in the report: (i) The type of event, date held, address and name, if any, of the place where the activity was held, and approximate number of individuals participating or in attendance. (ii) The total amount of all contributions. (iii) The gross receipts of the fund-raising event. (iv) The expenditures incident to the event. (e) The full name of each individual from whom contributions are received during the period covered by the campaign statement, together with the individual's street address, the amount contributed, the date on which each contribution was received, and the cumulative amount contributed by that individual. The occupation, employer, and principal place of business must be stated if the individual's cumulative contributions are more than $100.00. For contributions of $5.00 or less by an individual to a political committee or independent committee, the secretary of state shall accept for filing any written communication from the political committee or independent committee that contains the information otherwise required under this subsection. Any written communication under this subdivision does not need to contain an original signature. (f) The Except those individuals reported under subdivision (e), the cumulative amount contributed and the name and address of each individual , except those individuals reported under subdivision (e), who contributed to the committee. The occupation, employer, and principal place of business must be stated for each individual who contributed more than $100.00. (g) The name and street address of each person, other than an individual, from whom contributions are received during the period covered by the campaign statement, together with an itemization of the amounts contributed, the date on which each contribution was received, and the cumulative amount contributed by that person. (h) The name, address, and amount given by an individual who contributed to the total amount contributed by a person who is other than a committee or an individual. The occupation, employer, and principal place of business must be stated if the individual contributed more than $100.00 of the total amount contributed by a person who is other than a committee or an individual. (i) The Except for expenditures made to or on behalf of another committee, candidate, or ballot question, the cumulative total of expenditures and other disbursements totaling $50.00 or less to any person made during the period covered by the campaign statement. except for expenditures made to or on behalf of another committee, candidate, or ballot question. (j) The full name and street address of each person to whom expenditures or other disbursements totaling more than $50.00 were made, together with the amount of each separate expenditure or disbursement to each person during the period covered by the campaign statement; the purpose of the expenditure or disbursement; the full name and street address of the person providing the consideration for which any expenditure or disbursement was made if different from the payee; the itemization regardless of amount of each expenditure made to or on behalf of another committee, candidate, or ballot question; and the cumulative amount of expenditures for or against that candidate or ballot question for an election cycle. An expenditure made in support of more than 1 candidate or ballot question, or both, must be apportioned reasonably among the candidates or ballot questions, or both. (2) A candidate committee or ballot question committee shall report all cumulative amounts required by under this section on a per election cycle basis. Except as provided in subsection (1)(j), an independent committee, independent expenditure committee, or political committee shall report all cumulative amounts as required by under this section on a calendar year basis. (3) A campaign statement of a committee, in addition to the other information required by under this section, must include an itemized list of all expenditures during the reporting period for election day busing of electors to the polls, get-out-the-vote activities, slate cards, challengers, poll watchers, and poll workers. (4) A campaign statement of a ballot question committee, in addition to the other information required under this section, must include all of the following: (a) An affirmation that the committee has not knowingly or willfully received, solicited, or accepted contributions from a foreign national. (b) An affirmation that the donor associated with each contribution is not a foreign national and has not knowingly or willfully received, solicited, or accepted more than $100,000.00 in aggregate from foreign nationals in the 4 years immediately preceding the date of the contribution. (5) (4) For a reporting period in which a contribution is received that is to be part of a bundled contribution or a reporting period in which a bundled contribution is delivered to the candidate committee of a candidate for statewide elective office, a bundling committee shall report to the secretary of state, on a form provided by the secretary of state, all of the following information, as applicable, about each contribution received or delivered as part of a bundled contribution, and about each bundled contribution delivered, in the reporting period: (a) The amount of each contribution, the date it was received by the bundling committee, and the candidate for statewide elective office whom the contributor designated as the intended recipient. (b) Each contributor's name and address and, for each contribution exceeding $100.00, the contributor's occupation, employer, and principal place of business. (c) The date each contribution is delivered to the candidate's statewide elective office candidate committee. (d) The total amount of bundled contributions delivered to that candidate committee during the reporting period and during the election cycle. (6) (5) With its delivery of a bundled contribution to the candidate committee of a candidate for statewide elective office, a bundling committee shall deliver a report to that candidate committee, on a form provided by the secretary of state, that includes all of the following information, as applicable, about each contribution delivered as part of the bundled contribution, and about all bundled contributions delivered to that candidate committee in the election cycle: (a) The amount of each contribution, the date it was received by the bundling committee, and the statewide elective office candidate the contributor designated as the intended recipient. (b) Each contributor's name and address and, for each contribution exceeding $100.00, the contributor's occupation, employer, and principal place of business. (c) The total amount of bundled contributions delivered to that candidate committee during the reporting period and during the election cycle. (7) (6) For a reporting period in which a bundled contribution is received, a candidate committee of a candidate for statewide elective office shall report to the secretary of state, on a form provided by the secretary of state, all of the following information, as applicable, about each contribution delivered as part of a bundled contribution received in the reporting period and about all bundled contributions received by that candidate committee: (a) The amount of each contribution, the date it was received by the candidate committee, and the name of the bundling committee that delivered the contribution. (b) Each contributor's name and address and, for each contribution exceeding $100.00, the contributor's occupation, employer, and principal place of business. (c) The total amount of bundled contributions received by that candidate committee during the reporting period and during the election cycle. (8) (7) For a reporting period in which a connected organization of a separate segregated fund makes a payment for a prize or 1 or more items authorized under section 55(8), the separate segregated fund shall report all of the following, as applicable: (a) The amount of any payment of costs for a prize, the value of the prize, the amount raised by the prize, and the amount, if any, reimbursed to the connected organization by the separate segregated fund for the prize. (b) The amount per item of any payment of costs for items to be sold or offered in return for a contribution as part of fundraising fund-raising activities for the separate segregated fund, the amount per item that each item is offered at or offered for sale at, the value of each item, the aggregate amount paid for those items, and the amount, if any, reimbursed to the connected organization by the separate segregated fund for any items. If 1 or more of the same items are sold or offered in return for a contribution, a report by item type satisfies the reporting requirement under this subdivision. (9) (8) As used in subsection (7), (8), "value" means the regular purchase price offered by the vendor from whom an item is purchased, less any customary discount offered based on the number of items purchased in the same transaction. Sec. 34a. (1) A ballot question committee shall not knowingly or willfully receive, solicit, or accept contributions from a foreign national, whether directly or indirectly. (2) After a ballot question committee receives a contribution, the ballot question committee shall obtain from the donor an affirmation that the donor is not a foreign national and has not knowingly or willfully received, solicited, or accepted more than $100,000.00 in aggregate from foreign nationals in the 4 years immediately preceding the date of the contribution. (3) A ballot question committee shall return a contribution made by a person prohibited from making a contribution under subsection (1) not later than 30 business days after receiving the contribution. (4) A person that violates this section is subject to a civil fine of not more than double the amount of the undisclosed contribution. Sec. 51. (1) A person, other than a committee, that makes an independent expenditure, advocating the election or defeat of a candidate or the qualification, passage, or defeat of a ballot question, in an amount of $100.01 or more in a calendar year shall file a report of the independent expenditure, within not later than 10 days after making that independent expenditure, with the clerk of the county of residence of that person. If the independent expenditure advocates the election or defeat of a candidate for state elective office or for judicial office, or for the qualification, passage, or defeat of a statewide ballot question, or if the person making the independent expenditure is not a resident of this state, the person shall file the report with the secretary of state in lieu of filing with a clerk of a county. The report required under this section must be made on an independent expenditure report form provided by the secretary of state, include the date of the expenditure, a brief description of the nature of the expenditure, the amount, the name and address of the person to whom it was paid, the name and address of the person filing the report, together with the name, address, occupation, employer, and principal place of business of each person that contributed $100.01 or more to the expenditure, and identify the candidate or ballot question for or against which the independent expenditure was made. If the independent expenditure advocates for the qualification, passage, or defeat of a statewide ballot question, the report must include an affirmation that the person making the independent expenditure has not knowingly or willfully accepted more than $100,000.00 in aggregate from foreign nationals in the 4 years immediately preceding the date the expenditure is made and that the entity will not knowingly or willfully accept more than $100,000.00 in aggregate from foreign nationals through the date of the election in which the ballot question will appear on the ballot. The filing official receiving the report shall forward copies, as required, to the appropriate filing officers as described in section 36. (2) If a person fails to file a report as required under this section, that person shall pay a late filing fee. If the person has made independent expenditures totaling less than $10,000.00, the late filing fee is $25.00 for each business day the report remains unfiled, but not to exceed $1,000.00. If the person has made independent expenditures totaling $10,000.00 or more, the late filing fee is $50.00 for each business day the report remains unfiled, but not to exceed $5,000.00. A person that violates this subsection by failing to file a report required under this section for more than 30 days after the report is required to be filed is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than 90 days or a fine of not more than $1,000.00, or both. Sec. 54. (1) Except as otherwise provided in this section and section 55, and except with respect to loans made in the ordinary course of business, a corporation, joint stock company, domestic dependent sovereign, or labor organization shall not make a contribution or expenditure or provide volunteer personal services that are excluded from the definition of a contribution under section 4(3)(a). (2) An officer, director, stockholder, attorney, agent, or any other person acting for a labor organization, a domestic dependent sovereign, or a corporation or joint stock company, whether incorporated under the laws of this or any other state or foreign country, except corporations formed for political purposes, shall not make a contribution or expenditure or provide volunteer personal services that are excluded from the definition of a contribution under section 4(3)(a). (3) A Except as otherwise provided in this section, a corporation, joint stock company, domestic dependent sovereign, or labor organization may make a contribution to a ballot question committee or independent expenditure committee subject to this act. A Except as otherwise provided in this section, a corporation, joint stock company, domestic dependent sovereign, or labor organization may make an independent expenditure in any amount advocating for the election or defeat of a candidate, or the qualification, passage, or defeat of a ballot question and does not for this reason become a committee, unless it solicits or receives contributions in excess of $500.00 for the purpose of making the independent expenditure, but is subject to the independent expenditure reporting requirements under section 51. (4) A foreign national shall not do any of the following: (a) Make a contribution, independent expenditure, or expenditure to promote or defeat a ballot question or to qualify a question for placement on the ballot. (b) Solicit, directly or indirectly, a donation, contribution, or expenditure by another person to promote or defeat a ballot question or to qualify a question for placement on the ballot. (c) Direct, dictate, control, or, directly or indirectly, participate in the decision-making process of a person to promote or defeat a ballot question or to qualify a question for placement on the ballot. (5) A foreign national shall not make a contribution or donation to any other person or entity with the express or implied condition that the contribution or donation or any part of it be used for any purpose prohibited under subsection (4). (6) No individual, candidate, political party, committee, or separate segregated fund shall, directly or indirectly through another person or entity, knowingly do either of the following: (a) Solicit, accept, or receive money from a foreign national for any purpose prohibited under subsection (4). (b) Make a contribution, expenditure, or independent expenditure using money received from a foreign national for any purpose prohibited under subsection (4). (7) (4) A person that knowingly violates this section is guilty of a felony punishable, if the person is an individual, by imprisonment for not more than 3 years or a fine of not more than $5,000.00, or both, or, if the person is not an individual, by a fine of not more than $10,000.00.